District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.101

Acceptance of subchapter — Procedure; vote required for approval; adoption by board of directors.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 303, Pub. L. 87-569, § 101
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 29, 44 DCR 1271
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-217, § 3(b), 46 DCR 284
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.101.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.3.
1973 Ed., § 29-1099b.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Cooperative Association Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-265, April 25, 1997, law notification 43 DCR 4355).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Cooperative Association Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-483, January 13, 1997, 44 DCR 626), § 3(b) of the Cooperative Association Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-59, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2235), and § 3 of the Cooperative Association Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. 12-203, December 2, 1997, 44 DCR 7498).